apertium-en-es.en.metadix
    <pardef n="cho/ose__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ose</l>
          <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ose</l>
          <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oses</l>
          <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>se</l>
          <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sen</l>
          <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>osing</l>
          <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>osing</l>
          <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>osing</l>
          <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cl/ing__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ings</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ung</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ung</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inging</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inging</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inging</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cl/othe__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>othe</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>othe</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>othes</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>othing</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>othing</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>othing</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="control__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>led</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>led</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ling</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ling</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ling</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ke/ep__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ep</l>
          <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ep</l>
          <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eps</l>
          <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pt</l>
          <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pt</l>
          <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eping</l>
          <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eping</l>
          <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eping</l>
          <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="deal__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/ie__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ies</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ied</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ied</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="swing"><i>sw</i><par n="cl/ing__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="tie"><i>t</i><par n="d/ie__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="weep"><i>we</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/>    </e>
      <e lm="keep out of the reach of children" a="eleka"><i>ke</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>out<b/>of<b/>the<b/>reach<b/>of<b/>children</l><r><g><b/>out<b/>of<b/>the<b/>reach<b/>of<b/>children</g></r></p></e>
      <e lm="keep hot" a="eleka"><i>ke</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>hot</l><r><g><b/>hot</g></r></p></e>
      <e lm="keep balanced" a="eleka"><i>ke</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>balanced</l><r><g><b/>balanced</g></r></p></e>
      <e lm="keep a secret" a="eleka"><i>ke</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>a<b/>secret</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>secret</g></r></p></e>
      <e lm="keep the peace" a="eleka"><i>ke</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>the<b/>peace</l><r><g><b/>the<b/>peace</g></r></p></e>
      <e lm="keep a distance" a="eleka"><i>ke</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>a<b/>distance</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>distance</g></r></p></e>
      <e lm="keep in shape" a="eleka"><i>ke</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>in<b/>shape</l><r><g><b/>in<b/>shape</g></r></p></e>
      <e lm="keep the peace" a="eleka"><i>ke</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>the<b/>peace</l><r><g><b/>the<b/>peace</g></r></p></e>
      <e lm="keep a safe distance" a="eleka"><i>ke</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>a<b/>safe<b/>distance</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>safe<b/>distance</g></r></p></e>
      <e lm="keep the fire going" a="eleka"><i>ke</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>the<b/>fire<b/>going</l><r><g><b/>the<b/>fire<b/>going</g></r></p></e>
      <e lm="keep to the right" a="eleka"><i>ke</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>to<b/>the<b/>right</l><r><g><b/>to<b/>the<b/>right</g></r></p></e>
      <e lm="keep fit" a="eleka"><i>ke</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>fit</l><r><g><b/>fit</g></r></p></e>
      <e lm="keep up to date" a="eleka"><i>ke</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>up<b/>to<b/>date</l><r><g><b/>up<b/>to<b/>date</g></r></p></e>
      <e lm="keep order" a="eleka"><i>ke</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>order</l><r><g><b/>order</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="keep well" a="eleka"><i>ke</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>well</l><r><g><b/>well</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="keep on maintaining" a="eleka"><i>ke</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>on<b/>maintaining</l><r><g><b/>on<b/>maintaining</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="cling" a="eleka"><i>cl</i><par n="cl/ing__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e r="LR" lm="burn"><i>burn</i><par n="deal__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="choose"><i>cho</i><par n="cho/ose__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="control"><i>control</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="counsel" a="doriua"><i>counsel</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="die"><i>d</i><par n="d/ie__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="deal"><i>deal</i><par n="deal__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="dispel"><i>dispel</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e r="LR" lm="dream"><i>dream</i><par n="deal__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="enrol"><i>enrol</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="enrol"><i>enrol</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="expel"><i>expel</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="fulfil" r="LR"><i>fulfil</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="fulfil" r="RL" alt="en_GB"><i>fulfil</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="keep on"><i>ke</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>on</l><r><g><b/>on</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="keep"><i>ke</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="label"><i>label</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e r="LR" lm="lean"><i>lean</i><par n="deal__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e r="LR" lm="leap"><i>leap</i><par n="deal__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="learn"><i>learn</i><par n="deal__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="mean"><i>mean</i><par n="deal__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="repel"><i>repel</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="signal"><i>signal</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="swing"><i>sw</i><par n="cl/ing__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="sweep"><i>swe</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="tie"><i>t</i><par n="d/ie__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="swing"><i>sw</i><par n="cl/ing__vblex"/>     </e>
<e lm="compel"><i>compel</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="remodel"><i>remodel</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
<e lm="creep"><i>cre</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="rebel"><i>rebel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="appal" r="LR"><i>appal</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="appal" alt="en_GB" r="RL"><i>appal</i><par n="control__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="libel" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>libel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
